Maryland, session 2025, SB0798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
32–102.
This title applies only in Wicomico County.
32–902.
(a) There is a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license.
(b) The Board may issue the license for use by:
(1) a hotel that has:
– 1 –

Ch. 794 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) at least 25 rooms;
(ii) a lobby with registration, mail desk, and seating facilities; and
(iii) a dining room that serves full–course meals at least twice daily;
or
(2) (i) a restaurant that:
1. has a proper and adequate dining room with facilities for
preparing and serving regular meals;
2. not counting seating at a bar or counter, has table seating
for at least 40 individuals; and
3. has average daily receipts from the sale of food, not
counting foodstuff contained in a mixed drink, that each month exceed the average daily
receipts from the sale of alcoholic beverages.
(ii) The seating requirement in item (i)1 of this item does not apply
to a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license holder who held the license on July 1, 1978.
(c) The license authorizes the license holder to sell beer, wine, and liquor at a
hotel or restaurant at retail at the place described in the license, for on–premises
consumption.
(g) (1) The Board may issue a wine permit to a holder of the license for use by
a restaurant that:
(i) at least 5 days per week, offers for sale and describes in a printed
menu:
1. breakfast and lunch;
2. breakfast and dinner; or
3. lunch and dinner; and
(ii) has an area used for the preparation and consumption of food
and beverages that is at least 80% of the area of the premises.
(2) Off–sale alcoholic beverages receipts shall be included in the calculation
of average daily receipts from the sale of alcoholic beverages under § 32–901(c)(2)(i)3 of this
subtitle.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 794
(3) The wine permit authorizes the license holder to sell, at retail, at the
place described in the license:
(i) beer, wine, and liquor for on–premises consumption; and
(ii) wine for off–premises consumption.
(4) The term of the wine permit is the same as the term of the Class B
license.
(5) If the premises is open for business as a restaurant, the hours and days
of sale for the wine permit are:
(i) 10 a.m. to midnight, Monday through Saturday; and
(ii) 12:30 p.m. to midnight on Sunday.
(6) Wine sold under the wine permit may not have an alcohol content
greater than 15.5%.
(7) An applicant for the wine permit shall complete the form that the Board
provides.
(8) Advertising, posting of notice, and public hearing requirements for the
wine permit are the same as those for Class B licenses.
(9) The Board may adopt regulations to carry out this subsection, including
a limit on the number of wine permits to be granted.
(10) The annual permit fee is $1,500.
(h) The holder of a Class B beer, wine, and liquor restaurant license that has been
issued a Class 9 limited distillery license may sell products manufactured under the
distillery license at the place described in the Class B license in a manner consistent with
the underlying Class B license for on– and off–premises consumption.
(I) (1) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT
UNDER § 32–1104 OF THIS TITLE TO A HOLDER OF A LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION
IF THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT IS LOCATED WITHIN OR IMMEDIATELY ADJACENT
TO A SPECIAL EVENT AREA IDENTIFIED IN A CLASS C PER DIEM MUNICIPAL TO–GO
BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE ISSUED UNDER § 32–1314 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE
HOLDER TO SELL AT RETAIL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR IN APPROVED TO–GO CUPS
THAT MAY BE CARRIED OUTSIDE THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT AND INTO THE
DESIGNATED SPECIAL EVENT AREA.
– 3 –

Ch. 794 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
32–1104.
(A) THERE IS A TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE PERMIT TO A HOLDER OF A CLASS B BEER,
WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE IF THE LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT IS LOCATED WITHIN
OR IMMEDIATELY ADJACENT TO A SPECIAL EVENT AREA IDENTIFIED IN AND FOR
USE IN CONJUNCTION WITH A CLASS C PER DIEM MUNICIPAL TO–GO BEER, WINE,
AND LIQUOR LICENSE.
(C) THE PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO SELL AT RETAIL BEER, WINE,
AND LIQUOR IN APPROVED TO–GO CUPS THAT MAY BE CARRIED OUTSIDE THE
LICENSED ESTABLISHMENT OF THE CLASS B LICENSE AND INTO THE DESIGNATED
SPECIAL EVENT AREA.
(D) THE PERMIT HOLDER SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR COMPLYING WITH
ALL APPLICABLE LAWS AND REGULATIONS.
(E) THE TERM OF THE PERMIT IS THE SAME AS THE TERM OF THE
ASSOCIATED CLASS C PER DIEM MUNICIPAL TO–GO BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR
LICENSE.
(F) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS RELATED TO THE ISSUANCE
OF AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE PERMIT, INCLUDING REGULATIONS RELATED TO:
(1) THE DESIGNATION OF A SPECIAL EVENT AREA;
(2) THE HOURS OF SALE;
(3) AGE VERIFICATION REQUIREMENTS;
(4) THE USE OF SPECIFIED TO–GO CUPS; AND
(5) ADVERTISING, POSTING OF NOTICE, AND PUBLIC HEARING
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT.
(G) THE FEE FOR THE PERMIT IS $20 PER DAY.
32–1314.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 794
(A) THERE IS A CLASS C PER DIEM MUNICIPAL TO–GO BEER, WINE, AND
LIQUOR LICENSE.
(B) THE LICENSE ENTITLES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO ALLOW BEER, WINE,
AND LIQUOR SOLD BY A HOLDER OF A TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT PERMIT UNDER §
32–1104 OF THIS TITLE TO ENTER A DESIGNATED SPECIAL EVENT AREA DESCRIBED
IN THE LICENSE FOR A PERIOD NOT EXCEEDING 7 CONSECUTIVE DAYS.
(C) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE TO A MUNICIPALITY IN THE
COUNTY.
(D) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS RELATED TO THE ISSUANCE
OF AND REQUIREMENTS FOR A LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING
REGULATIONS RELATED TO:
(1) THE DESIGNATION OF A SPECIAL EVENT AREA;
(2) THE HOURS OF SALE;
(3) AGE VERIFICATION REQUIREMENTS;
(4) THE USE OF SPECIFIED TO–GO CUPS;
(5) ADVERTISING, POSTING OF NOTICE, AND PUBLIC HEARING
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE LICENSE AND ANY ASSOCIATED TEMPORARY TO–GO EVENT
PERMIT; AND
(6) PUBLIC SAFETY AND EVENT SECURITY REQUIREMENTS.
(E) THE FEE FOR THE LICENSE IS $45 PER DAY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 5 –